North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 2. Conversion of Corporation.

§ 55A-11A-9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 55A-11A-10.
Conversion.

A charitable or religious corporation may convert to a domestic limited liability company if the converting charitable or religious corporation complies with the requirements of this part and the requirements of

G.S. 57D-9-20

, 57D-9-21, and 57D-9-22.

History.

2016-114, s. 5.